Tennessee, session 114, SB2673.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 7, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a)
(1) This section is known and may be cited as the "Automotive Supply
Chain Resilience and Expansion Act."
(2) The purpose of this section is to provide strategic support to the
automotive manufacturing sector in response to disruptions caused by federal
tariffs and global trade instability.
(3) As used in this section:
(A) "Department" means the department of economic and
community development;
(B) "Eligible entity" means any automotive manufacturer or
supplier operating in this state; and
(C) "Tariff-related disruption" means increased costs, reduced
revenues, or supply interruptions resulting directly or indirectly from
federal tariffs or foreign retaliatory measures.
(b)
(1) There is established the automotive tariff relief fund, to be
administered by the department.
SB2673
011732
- 1 -

(2) The purpose of the fund is to issue grants to eligible entities that
demonstrate hardship due to tariff-related disruptions.
(3) Grants may be used for cost mitigation, inventory diversification,
workforce retention, or capital investment.
(4) The department shall promulgate rules to create grant application
procedures and documentation requirements.
(c)
(1) The department shall provide refundable tax credits and low-interest
loans to eligible entities that:
(A) Relocate critical supply operations;
(B) Expand domestic sourcing within this state; or
(C) Invest in technology or equipment that mitigates reliance on
tariff-affected imports.
(2) The amount of any credits provided under subdivision (c)(1) must not
exceed thirty percent (30%) of qualifying investment expenditures.
(d)
(1) The department shall expand export support services to eligible
entities seeking new international markets.
(2) Services may include export financing assistance, trade mission
subsidies, foreign regulatory compliance, and market entry consulting.
(3) The department shall prioritize businesses impacted by foreign
retaliatory tariffs.
(e)
(1) State procurement agencies may:
(A) Adjust bid scoring to reflect cost increases from tariffs;
- 2 - 011732

(B) Grant temporary preference to domestic suppliers impacted
by trade measures; and
(C) Modify contract requirements to allow use of alternative
materials.
(2) The department of finance and administration shall promulgate rules
to effectuate the purposes of this subsection (e).
(f)
(1) There is created the automotive resilience task force, composed of
five (5) members and appointed by the governor. The task force must consist of
representatives from industry, labor, academia, and state and local government.
(2) The task force shall:
(A) Monitor federal trade actions and foreign retaliatory
measures;
(B) Assess economic impact on the automotive sector; and
(C) Recommend policy responses and industry adaptations.
(3) The task force shall submit a biennial report of its findings and
recommendations to the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives no later than December 31 of each year the report is due.
SECTION 2. If a provision of this act or its application to a person or circumstance is
held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that can
be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of this
act are severable.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 011732